Rhode Island statutes. Title 17 Elections
Chapter 9.1 Registration of Voters

17-9.1-1.
Registration required to vote.

No person shall be a qualified voter at any election unless that person is registered under the authority of this chapter or pursuant to any other provisions of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 4.

17-9.1-2.
Duty of state board — Registration equipment — Forms.

It shall be the duty of the state board to prescribe the style, color, quality, and dimensions of all registration forms, containers, and other equipment required to provide for the permanent registration of voters, and for filing and safekeeping of the registration forms, and it shall furnish a sufficient quantity of registration forms, containers, and other equipment to the several cities and towns. It shall also be the duty of the state board to furnish the several cities and towns with any special professional assistance that may be necessary to assure the proper installation and servicing of the equipment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 4.

17-9.1-2.1.
Duplicate voter registration information.

Any local board may adopt an alternative form and means for obtaining and retaining duplicative voter registration information which is approved by the state board of elections. The form shall provide for the information required by §

17-9.1-6

and shall be kept in the order specified by §§

17-9.1-13

and

17-9.1-14

. The alternative form need not be of a distinctive color; provided, that the alternative form is substantially different in size and shape from the card designated the original under the provisions of §

17-9.1-6

. The alternative form also need not provide for a signature.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 4.

17-9.1-3.
Periods when boards receive registrations.

The local boards shall open their respective offices for the purposes of receiving registration of voters throughout the year during the regular business hours. Registration for any election shall close on the thirtieth (30th) day preceding an election; provided, that local boards shall not receive the registration on Sundays or legal holidays, and may receive the registrations during additional hours each day from the fortieth (40th) to the thirtieth (30th) day before any election. Nothing contained in this section shall be construed as restricting the right of statewide or local registration agents or members of the general assembly to accept registrations of voters on any day. The acceptance of registrations at any other time shall not affect the validity of any election.

Notwithstanding any other sections of the general laws to the contrary, all local boards of canvassers shall remain open from eight-thirty (8:30) a.m. until four o’clock (4:00) p.m. on the last day prescribed by law for the taking of voter registrations to permit participation of the voters in the next succeeding election. In the event that the last day prescribed by law for the taking of voter registrations is a Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday, then the local board may;

Designate one publicly accessible location in the city or town at which voter registrations will be taken; and

Designate the hours during which voter registration will be taken at that location, which hours shall include the hours from one o’clock (1:00) p.m. until four o’clock (4:00) p.m.

If a local board does designate a location other than its regular place of business or does designate hours other than eight-thirty o’clock (8:30) a.m. until four o’clock (4:00) p.m., it shall:

Publicly announce those designation(s) at least ten (10) days prior to the last day provided by law for the taking of voter registrations; and

Advertise those designation(s) in a newspaper of general circulation in the city or town at least twice prior to the last day prescribed by law for the taking of voter registrations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 4; P.L. 1996, ch. 137, § 1.

17-9.1-4.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 4; Repealed by P.L. 1996, ch. 137, § 2, effective August 2, 1996.

17-9.1-4.1.
Registration drives at high schools.

It shall be the duty of local boards to annually conduct a voter registration drive at each high school within the city or town in cooperation with the administration of the schools. Each principal of every public or private high school and director of each vocational school in this state may be a registration agent whose authority shall be limited to receiving and accepting registrations as electors from those qualified applicants who are enrolled as students within the school or are employed within the school. The principal or director may designate one or more persons in the school to serve as registration agents with the same authority as the principal of the school, provided each designation is filed with the local board for the city or town in which the school is located. Each person who is a registration agent pursuant to this section shall be sworn to the faithful performance of his or her duties and shall be subject to removal as a registration agent by the local board for cause shown. All registration made under this section shall be made in accordance with rules and regulations established by the local board of the city or town in which the school is located.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 4.

17-9.1-4.2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 4; Repealed by P.L. 1996, ch. 137, § 2, effective August 2, 1996.

17-9.1-5.
Local registration agents.

The several local boards shall appoint a sufficient number of agents who shall serve throughout each year for the purpose of receiving registrations of persons residing in the city or town in which the agent was appointed to act. The agents shall be sworn to the faithful performance of their duties, shall be subject to removal by the local board, and shall have power to accept registrations on Sundays and at any other time or place designated by the local board, whether in or out of the presence of the members of the local board. In addition, all members of the general assembly shall have the power to accept registration on Sundays and any other day, and the local boards of canvassers shall provide all registration forms to the general assembly members.

The several local boards or their agents shall additionally hold a special registration session in any factory, mill, wholesale or retail or other employing establishment, or hospital, home for aged, or convalescent home within their city or town in the even numbered years on or before July 5th for the state primary, and on or before August 5th for the state election, if in the case of the primary a request for the special registration session is made during the months of May or June, and in the case of the election a request for the special registration is made during the months of June and July by ten (10) or more voters of the city or town filing a petition with the local board for the holding of a special registration session in the factory, mill, wholesale or retail or other employing establishment, or hospital, home for aged, or convalescent home, signed by them with their names and addresses as they appear on voting lists of the city or town, and stating that ten (10) or more persons employed in the factory, mill, wholesale or retail or other employing establishment, or convalescent home desire and are entitled to be registered in the city or town. The special registration session shall then be held if, at the time the petition is filed, the local board is in receipt of permission in writing from the tenant, or, if there is no tenant, from the owner of the factory, mill, wholesale or retail or other employing establishment, or the operator of the hospital, home for aged, or convalescent home to use their premises for the purpose of holding the special session.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 4.

17-9.1-5.1.
Statewide registration agents.

The state board of elections shall appoint a sufficient number of agents who shall serve throughout the year to perform the duties assigned to them by §

17-7-5

and any other duties that may be assigned them by the board. Each registrar who performs his or her duties faithfully and completely, and who attends an annual training session which includes a presentation on changes to the election laws during the previous year, shall be automatically reappointed as a registration agent.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 4.

17-9.1-5.2.
Qualifications and jurisdiction of registration agents.

No registration agent, whether appointed by a local board, by the state board, or empowered by law, shall be authorized to accept registrations outside of the state of Rhode Island, and all the registration agents shall themselves be registered to vote in the state of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 4.

17-9.1-6.
Form of registration cards — Confidentiality of place of registration.

Registration forms shall consist of the number of sets of cards and of the size and color that shall be determined by the state board of elections, one of which forms shall be designated as the original and any others as duplicates. The forms shall be ruled with appropriate spaces and headings to indicate the registrant’s name, residence address, mailing address if different from residence address, date of birth, and registrant’s signature and date of affixation of signature, and may include any other information, certifications, and declarations, including those made under the penalty of perjury, that may be required by the state board in order to administer a single and unified system of voter registration in accordance with applicable state and federal laws which shall enable duly registered voters to vote in all elections in their respective voting districts, including elections for federal officers.

Notwithstanding that registration forms are public records, nothing contained in the registration forms, nor any identifying characteristics of the forms such as size or color, shall indicate the particular office of the division of motor vehicles at which the voter was registered, nor shall there be any indication that the voter was registered at any other state, federal, or private agency. Nothing contained in this section shall restrict the state board of elections from maintaining confidential records showing the actual place of registration of all voters.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 4; P.L. 1996, ch. 235, § 1.

17-9.1-7.
Registration at the division of motor vehicles — Additional agencies.

Every person applying at the division of motor vehicles for a driver’s license or a renewal of the license, or personal identification document issued by the division of motor vehicles, and who is or may be by the next general election qualified to vote, shall be registered to vote, or if previously registered, be afforded the opportunity to change their address for voting purposes.

The application to register to vote must be offered simultaneously with the application for the driver’s license or renewal of it or personal identification document. Division of motor vehicles employees must provide to applicants for driver’s licenses, license renewal, or personal identification documents the same level of assistance and instruction with respect to the application to register to vote as is provided with respect to the application for driver’s licenses, renewal of the license, or personal identification documents; provided, that one signature may be sufficient on the application for driver’s license, renewal of the license, or personal identification document and the application to register to vote. The applicant shall be afforded the opportunity to decline to register to vote. If previously registered, the applicant shall be afforded the opportunity to change his or her address for voting purposes. In order to protect the privacy of those who do not wish to register to vote for any reason, the failure of an applicant for a driver’s license or renewal of it or a personal identification document to register to vote may not be used for any purposes other than to determine the person’s voter registration status.

The voter registration application shall contain the registrant’s name, residence address, mailing address if different from residence address, date of birth, and registrant’s signature and date of affixation of signature, and may include any other information, certifications, and declarations, including those made under the penalty of perjury, that may be required by the state board in order to administer a single and unified system of voter registration in accordance with applicable state and federal laws that shall enable duly registered voters to vote in all elections in their respective voting districts including, elections for federal officers. The voter registration application must also include, in print identical to that used in the attestation portion of the form, the following:

The penalties provided by law for submitting a false voter registration;

A statement that, if the applicant declines to register to vote, his or her decision will remain confidential and be used only for voter registration purposes; and

A statement that, if the applicant does register to vote, information regarding the office or branch of the division of motor vehicles to which the application was submitted will remain confidential, to be used only for voter registration purposes.

It shall be the responsibility of the division of motor vehicles to print and to have available at all times a sufficient number of voter registration forms in order to carry out the provisions of this section.

The completed voter registration application shall be transmitted by the division of motor vehicles to the central voter registration system mandated pursuant to §

17-6-1.2

not later than the next business day after the date of acceptance by the division of motor vehicles. Transmission shall be made by electronic means as prescribed by the secretary of state, and shall be in an electronic form compatible with the voter registration system maintained by the secretary of state.

Any person who has fully and correctly completed an application to register to vote at the division of motor vehicles is presumed to be registered as of the date of the acceptance of the registration by the division of motor vehicles, subject to verification of the registration by the local board as provided in §

17-9.1-25

.

Pursuant to §

17-9.1-11

, the division of motor vehicles shall not transmit the voter registration of any applicant who fails to certify that they are a citizen of the United States.

If a person who is ineligible to vote becomes registered to vote pursuant to this section, that person’s registration shall be presumed to be deemed officially authorized and not be deemed attributable to or the fault of that person. Notwithstanding the foregoing, anyone who knowingly and willfully provides false information pursuant to this section shall be subject to prosecution under §

17-9.1-12

.

The state board of elections shall have the authority to adopt regulations to implement and administer the provisions of this section, including all registrations taken at the division of motor vehicles.

In accordance with Section 7 of the National Voter Registration Act of 1993, 52 U.S.C. § 20506, other applicable state government agencies that the secretary verifies already collect documents that would provide proof of eligibility, including age, citizenship, and residence address, may follow the procedures for automatic voter registration enumerated for the division of motor vehicles as described in subsections (b) through (d) of this section.

Any additional agencies that are designated for automatic registration must follow the rules and protocols established in this section for the division of motor vehicles.

Effective date. The provisions of this section shall take effect thirty (30) days after the administrator of the division of motor vehicles certifies in writing to the general assembly that the Rhode Island motor vehicle licensing system (RIMS) computer system is capable of meeting the requirements set forth in this act. The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall consult with the secretary prior to making this determination about the computer system.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 4; P.L. 1996, ch. 235, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 345, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 226, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 321, § 1.

17-9.1-8.
Registration at designated agencies.

Every person who is or may be by the next general election qualified to vote may register to vote when being discharged from incarceration or when applying for services or assistance at any of the following offices:

Any office in the state that provides public assistance;

At or through any offices in the state that provide state-funded programs primarily engaged in providing services to persons with disabilities;

At armed forces recruitment offices, subject to procedures developed by the state board in cooperation with the United States Department of Defense;

At or through the department of corrections; and

At any other agencies within the state that shall be determined by the state board.

Voter registration agencies designated by the state board may include, but are not limited to:

State or local government offices such as public libraries, public schools, offices of city and towns clerks (including marriage license bureaus), fishing and hunting license bureaus, government revenue offices, unemployment compensation offices, and offices not described in subsection (a)(2) of this section that provide services to persons with disabilities; and

Federal and nongovernmental offices, with the agreement of those offices.

Persons must be provided this opportunity to register to vote not only at the time of their original application for services, but also when filing any recertification, renewal, or for a change of address relating to those services. Agencies providing voter registration assistance must offer the same degree of assistance to individuals in completing a voter registration form as they offer to individuals in completing the agency’s own forms, unless the applicant refuses the assistance.

Any person who provides voter registration assistance services in an agency is prohibited from:

Seeking to influence an applicant’s party preference or party registration;

Displaying any political preference or party allegiance;

Making any statement or taking any action the purpose or effect of which is to discourage the applicant from registering to vote; or

Making any statement or taking any action the purpose or effect of which is to lead the applicant to believe that a decision whether or not to register has any bearing on the availability of services or benefits or on discharge from incarceration.

Those who decline to register to vote must do so in writing or by failing to check a box on a form containing the question: “If you are not registered to vote where you live now, would you like to apply to register to vote here today? yes or no.”

The declination may be included in the agency application for services or on a separate form provided by the agency, subject to rules and regulations to be adopted by the state board.

No information regarding a person’s declination to register to vote may be used for any purpose other than voter registration. If an individual does register to vote, the particular agency at which the applicant submits a voter registration application may not be publicly disclosed.

The declination form to be used at agencies providing public or publicly funded assistance shall also contain the following statements and information:

“Applying to register or declining to register to vote will not affect the amount of assistance that you will be provided by this agency”; or, for those forms made available by the department of corrections: “Applying to register or declining to register to vote will not affect your discharge from incarceration”;

“If you do not check either box, you will be considered to have decided not to register to vote at this time.” (with “yes” and “no” boxes being provided);

“If you would like help filling out the voter registration application form, we will help you. The decision whether to seek or accept help is yours. You may fill out the application form in private”;

“If you believe that someone has interfered with your right to register or to decline to register to vote, your right to privacy in deciding whether to register or in applying to register to vote, or your right to choose your own political party or other political preference, you may file a complaint with the State Board of Elections, 2000 Plainfield Pike, Cranston, Rhode Island 02921, (401) 222-2345”;

A statement that if the applicant declines to register to vote, his or her decision will remain confidential and be used only for voter registration purposes; and

A statement that if the applicant does register to vote, information regarding the agency to which the application was submitted will remain confidential, to be used only for voter registration purposes.

The registration form to be provided in these agencies shall be the mail registration form adopted by the state board. Unless the registrant refuses to permit the agency to transmit the form to the state board or local board where the applicant resides, the agency shall transmit the completed registration form to the state board or any local board. However, if the registrant refuses, the registrant may either mail the form to the state board or any local board or may provide for delivery of the form to the state board or any local board either in person or through a third party. It shall be the responsibility of all state or state-funded agencies to have available at all times a sufficient number of voter registration forms in order to carry out the provisions of this section.

Unless the applicant refuses to permit the agency to transmit the completed voter registration form to the state board or to a local board, the agency shall be required to transmit the registration form within ten (10) days after acceptance, or if accepted on the last day or within five (5) days before the last day to register for an election, within five (5) days of acceptance.

The department of corrections and each agency designated by the board to register persons to vote when applying for services or assistance shall report to the state board:

The number of persons applying for services and assistance or the number of persons discharged from incarceration following felony convictions who are eligible to vote;

The number of persons who have been registered to vote at that agency;

The number of forms that have been transmitted by the agency to the state or local board; and

The number of persons who have declined to register to vote at that agency. Reports to the state board by each designated agency shall be on a quarterly basis.

Any person who has fully and correctly completed an application to register to vote at a designated agency is presumed to be registered as of the date of the acceptance of the registration by the designated agency, subject to verification of the registration by the state board or any local board as provided in §

17-9.1-25

.

If a voter registration agency which is primarily engaged in providing services to persons with disabilities provides those services at the person’s home, the agency shall provide the voter registration services authorized by this section at the person’s home.

The state board of elections shall have the authority to adopt regulations to implement and administer the provisions of this section, including all registrations taken at designated agencies.

In cases where the findings required by §

17-6-1.2(a)(4)

have been made, transmission shall be made by electronic means as prescribed by the secretary of state, and shall be in an electronic form compatible with the voter registration system maintained by the secretary of state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 4; P.L. 2005, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 345, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 366, § 4; P.L. 2006, ch. 476, § 4; P.L. 2020, ch. 7, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 8, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 395, § 5, effective July 14, 2021.

17-9.1-9.
Registration by mail.

Every person who is or may be by the next general election qualified to vote may register to vote by mail. Mail registration shall be accomplished through the use of the federal mail registration form prescribed by the federal election commission under the National Voter Registration Act of 1993, 42 USC 1973gg, and/or through the use of a mail registration form prescribed by the state board of elections which complies with the requirements contained in the National Voter Registration Act of 1993. The form shall contain the registrant’s name, residence address, mailing address if different from residence address, date of birth, and registrant’s signature and date of affixation of signature, and may include any other information, certifications, and declarations, including those made under the penalty of perjury, that may be required by the state board in order to administer a single and unified system of voter registration in accordance with applicable state and federal laws which shall enable duly registered voters to vote in all elections in their respective voting districts, including elections for federal officers.

Any person who has fully and correctly completed an application to register to vote by mail which is delivered by the postal service to the State Board of Elections or any local board shall be presumed to be registered as of the date it is postmarked by the postal service, subject to verification of the registration by the state board of any local board as provided in §

17-9.1-25

. In those cases where the mail registration form is received not later than five (5) days after the last date to register to vote for an election and the postmark is either missing or unclear, the voter shall be presumed to have registered on or prior to the last day to register for an election, subject to verification of the registration by the state board or any local board as provided in §

17-9.1-25

.

The state board of elections shall have authority to adopt regulations to implement and administer mail registrations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 4; P.L. 1996, ch. 235, § 2.

17-9.1-9.1.
Shut-in voters, serviceperson’s dependents, or peace corps registrations.

Shut-in voters. Every person otherwise duly qualified to vote who by reason of illness or physical or mental disability is unable to register in person at the office of the local board may register to vote by mail.

Serviceperson’s dependents. Every person otherwise duly qualified to vote who by reason of being the spouse or dependent child of a member of the armed forces of the United States in active service who is qualified to vote and is absent from this state, and is with the member of the armed forces and unable to register in person, may register to vote by mail.

Peace corps registration. Every person otherwise duly qualified to register to vote who by reason of being a peace corps volunteer as defined in 22 U.S.C. § 2504, or a peace corps leader as defined in 22 U.S.C. § 2505, or the spouse or dependent child of the volunteer or leader, is absent from this state and unable to register in person and desiring to register, may register to vote by mail.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 4.

17-9.1-10.
Additional method of registering.

In addition to the methods for registering to vote provided in §§

17-9.1-7

,

17-9.1-8

,

17-9.1-9

, and

17-9.1-34

, whenever any person who is, or may be, by the next election qualified to vote desires to register, that person may appear before the local board of the city or town in which he or she has his or her residence, as defined in §

17-1-3.1

, or before the clerk or other duly authorized agent of the board, or before a registrar appointed by the state board of elections, and shall furnish the information required of him or her by this chapter and any information described in §§

17-9.1-23

and

17-9.1-24

that the registrant may wish to record, and after the information has been recorded on the registry card furnished for that purpose, the person shall sign his or her name and certify to the truth of the facts recorded in the appropriate spaces in the card; provided, whenever any person is unable to sign his or her name because of physical incapacity or otherwise, he or she shall make his mark “(X)”, which shall be witnessed by the person receiving the registration.

It shall be the duty of the local board or clerk or other duly authorized agent of the board or registrar of the state board of elections to inform the person registering to vote that the voter will be mailed an acknowledgement card advising the person of the disposition of the registration and in the process verifying that the person resides at the address provided on the registration form. The person shall also be advised that if the acknowledgement card is returned as undeliverable, the person will be placed on the inactive list of voters pending the results of the confirmation process described in §

17-9.1-26

. Nothing contained in this section shall be deemed to entitle a person to vote whose registration form has not been filed with the local board at least thirty (30) days before an election.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 4; P.L. 2016, ch. 7, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 8, § 1.

17-9.1-11.
Certification of citizenship.

Before the name of any person shall be placed on the voting list, the person shall, at the time of registration, certify or declare that the person is a citizen of the United States.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 4.

17-9.1-12.
False certificates in registration.

Every person who knowingly and willfully makes any false certificate or declaration in registering his or her name pursuant to the provisions of this chapter or who knowingly and willfully makes any false statement in any affirmation or confirmation form or who, acting in the capacity of a voter registrar, knowingly and willfully registers a person who has made a false certificate or declaration, shall be guilty of a felony.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 4.

17-9.1-13.
Filing of registration cards — Transmittal to secretary of state.

The original registration cards shall be arranged and maintained in alphabetical order by surname for the entire city or town and shall be filed in suitable containers. Any duplicate set of cards shall be maintained at the discretion of the local canvassing authority, subject to prior approval from the state board of elections.

The local board shall be required to provide promptly to the office of the secretary of state in connection with the operation and maintenance of the central voter register information provided to the local board relative to any voter registration. The information to be provided shall be that which may be necessary for the secretary of state to operate and maintain the central voter register in accordance with chapter 6 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 4.

17-9.1-14.
Custody of registration cards.

The containers of the original and any duplicate registration cards in the possession of the local board and the keys to the containers shall be kept in the custody of the local board, and these containers shall remain securely locked at all times and shall be opened only by the local board or its specially authorized agent at its office, except as provided in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 4.

17-9.1-15.
Registration records public.

Except as otherwise provided in §

17-9.1-6

, the original and any duplicate registration cards shall be public records and shall be open to public inspection and copying at all reasonable times.

Except where confidentiality is otherwise required under other provisions of this title, all other records concerning the implementation of programs and activities conducted for the purpose of ensuring the accuracy and currency of official lists of eligible voters, and the registration lists prepared pursuant to §

17-9.1-21

, shall also be deemed public records.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 4.

17-9.1-16.
Procedure on change of address — Fail-safe voting provisions.

Change of address within the same city or town.

A registered voter who has moved from a residence address within a voting district to another residence address within the same voting district and who has not notified the local board of the change of residence address thirty (30) days or more prior to the election shall be permitted to vote at the polling place designated for the voting district or at the local board upon completion of a written affirmation form which shall record the voter’s change of address within the voting district. The form may be completed by the voter at the polling place designated for the voting district and thereafter transmitted, after the close of the polls, to the local board or may be completed at the local board.

Any registered voter who has moved his or her residence from one residence address to another residence address within the same city or town and who has not notified the local board of the change of residence address thirty (30) days or more prior to the election shall be permitted to vote as follows:

A registered voter who has moved from a residence address in one voting district to a residence address in another voting district within the same city or town thirty (30) days or more preceding an election shall be permitted to vote a full ballot at the polling place of the new residence address or at the local board upon completion of an affirmation form which shall record the voter’s change of address. If the form is completed at the polling place, the form shall be forwarded to the local board after the close of the polls; or

Any registered voter who has moved less than thirty (30) days preceding an election from one address to another address within a different voting district within the same city or town shall be permitted to vote at the polling place of the former address or at the local board and is entitled to vote the full ballot for the old polling place upon completion of an affirmation form which shall record the voter’s change of address.

Any registered voter to whom a confirmation mailing was sent by either the state board or a local board, based upon information other than change of address information received from or through the postal service, shall be placed on the inactive list of voters if the recipient of the confirmation mailing fails to return the related confirmation card. If the voter continues to reside in the same city or town and at the residence address currently recorded on the voter’s registration card or at a residence address within the same voting district, the voter shall be permitted to vote at the polling place for that residence address upon signing an affirmation form. If the voter has moved to a new residence address within the same city or town but within a different voting district the registered voter shall be permitted to vote a full ballot at the polling place of the new residence address or at the local board upon completion of an affirmation form which shall record the voter’s change of address.

Any registered voter to whom a confirmation mailing was sent by either the state board or a local board, based upon change of address information provided by or through the postal service, shall not be placed on the inactive list even if the recipient of the confirmation mailing fails to return the related confirmation card. The registered voter shall be permitted to vote at the polling place of the new residence address or the local board without the requirement of signing an affirmation form. If the change of address information provided by or through the postal service was in error, the registered voter shall be permitted to vote at the polling place of his or her former address or at the local board upon signing the required affirmation form.

Change of address from one city or town to another city or town.

A voter who has moved his or her residence, as defined in §

17-1-3.1

, from the address at which the voter is registered to another within a different city or town shall be required to register in the city or town to which the voter has moved; provided, that no person qualified to vote in any city or town in this state shall lose his or her right to vote in that city or town by reason of his or her removal to another city or town in this state during the thirty (30) days, less one day, next preceding an election or primary in the former city or town.

That a voter who remains within the state, although he or she fails to register in the city or town to which the voter has moved within time to vote in the city or town, shall be permitted to vote by special paper ballot to be provided by the secretary of state upon application for it approved by the board of canvassers of the voter’s former city or town for federal and statewide elected officials only during the six (6) months, less one day, next preceding an election or primary.

Persons erroneously excluded from certified voting list. Any voter finding that his or her name is not on the certified voting list of his or her city or town being used at any election may cast a provisional ballot in accordance with §

17-19-24.1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 4; P.L. 2015, ch. 79, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 85, § 1.

17-9.1-17.
Reregistration — Notice to city or town of previous address.

A voter may register in a city or town into which he or she has moved whether or not the voter has notified the board of the city or town in which the voter was last registered of the voter’s change of address. The action of registration shall automatically cancel the voter’s registration in the former city or town.

The local board of any city or town shall, upon receiving the registration of any person, notify the board of the city or town stated by the person to be that person’s last place of residence, of the registration. At that time, the last mentioned board shall retain the original registration card of the person in accordance with the approved records retention schedule for boards of canvassers issued by the state archives.

The state board shall have authority by regulation to direct the manner in which the provisions of this section are carried out by the local boards and the secretary of state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 4; P.L. 2007, ch. 384, § 1.

17-9.1-17.1.
Registration — Notice to jurisdiction of previous out-of-state address.

The secretary of state shall, upon receiving a voter’s new registration, notify the appropriate election official of the newly registered voter’s last place of residence only if it is located outside the state of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 42, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 46, § 1.

17-9.1-18.
Change of name.

Any registered voter whose name has been changed by marriage or court action shall be entitled to have the change of name recorded on the registration records of the local board, and upon the recording, shall be entitled to vote thereafter under the changed name. The local board shall immediately notify the secretary of state of the action.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 4.